Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1277
Existing Business Assistance Division;
contracts; reports.

The Existing Business Assistance Division
shall require, as a condition of contracts awarded under the Business Development
Services Program, satisfactory quarterly reports from recipients describing
services provided, clients served, and expenditures. The division shall include,
as part of the Department of Economic Development's annual status report under
section 81-1201.11, a description of the services provided under
the Business Development Partnership Act, an analysis of the impact
of the services, recommendations
regarding the services, and an evaluation of the performance
of service deliverers.

Laws 1987, LB 736, § 6;

Laws 1989, LB 639, § 12;

Laws 2011, LB404, § 6.